Utah statutes.
48-2c-1615.   Actions to restrain transaction of business in state.

The division may order any foreign company, or any agent of a foreign company, to cease doing any business in this state if the foreign company has failed to register under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session

